Illinois, session 104th, SB1070.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 14-119 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/14-119)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 14-119)7    Sec. 14-119. Amount of widow's annuity. 8    (a) The The widow's annuity shall be 50% of the amount of 9retirement annuity payable to the member on the date of death 10while on retirement if an annuitant, or on the date of his 11death while in service if an employee, regardless of his age on 12such date, or on the date of withdrawal if death occurred after 13termination of service under the conditions prescribed in the 14preceding Section.15    (b) If an eligible widow, regardless of age, has in her 16care any unmarried child or children of the member under age 18 17(under age 22 if a full-time student), the widow's annuity 18shall be increased in the amount of 5% of the retirement 19annuity for each such child, but the combined payments for a 20widow and children shall not exceed 66 2/3% of the member's 21earned retirement annuity.22    The amount of retirement annuity from which the widow's 23annuity is derived shall be that earned by the member without   SB1070- 2 -LRB104 05408 RPS 15437 b1regard to whether he attained age 60 prior to his withdrawal 2under the conditions stated or prior to his death.3    (c) Marriage of a child shall render the child ineligible 4for further consideration in the increase in the amount of the 5widow's annuity.6    Attainment of age 18 (age 22 if a full-time student) shall 7render a child ineligible for further consideration in the 8increase of the widow's annuity, but the annuity to the widow 9shall be continued thereafter, without regard to her age at 10that time.11    (d) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (d), a 12widow's annuity payable on account of any covered employee who 13has been a covered employee for at least 18 months shall be 14reduced by 1/2 of the amount of survivors benefits to which his 15beneficiaries are eligible under the provisions of the Federal 16Social Security Act, except that (1) the amount of any widow's 17annuity payable under this Article shall not be reduced by 18reason of any increase under that Act which occurs after the 19offset required by this subsection is first applied to that 20annuity, and (2) for benefits granted on or after January 1, 211992, the offset under this subsection (d) shall not exceed 2250% of the amount of widow's annuity otherwise payable.23    Beginning July 1, 2009, the offset under this subsection 24(d) shall no longer be applied to any widow's annuity of any 25person who began receiving retirement benefits or a widow's 26annuity prior to January 1, 1998.   SB1070- 3 -LRB104 05408 RPS 15437 b1    Beginning July 1, 2009, the offset under this subsection 2(d) shall no longer be applied to the widow's annuity of any 3person who began receiving a widow's annuity on or after 4January 1, 1998 and before the effective date of this 5amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly. 6    Any person who began receiving retirement benefits after 7January 1, 1998 and before the effective date of this 8amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly may, during a 9one-time election period established by the System, elect to 10reduce his or her retirement annuity by 3.825% in exchange for 11not having the offset under this subsection (d) applied to his 12or her widow's annuity.13    Any employee in service on the effective date of this 14amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly may, at the time of 15retirement, elect to reduce his or her retirement annuity by 163.825% in exchange for not having the offset under this 17subsection (d) applied to his or her widow's annuity.18    If a widow's annuity is payable to the widow of an employee 19based on the employee's death in service, then the offset 20under this subsection (d) shall no longer be applied to the 21widow's annuity. 22    A retiree who elects to reduce his or her retirement 23annuity under this subsection (d) in exchange for not having 24the offset applied may make an irrevocable election to 25eliminate the reduction of his or her retirement annuity if 26there is a change in marital status due to death or divorce,   SB1070- 4 -LRB104 05408 RPS 15437 b1but the retiree is not entitled to reimbursement of any 2benefit reduction prior to the election. 3    (e) Upon the death of a recipient of a widow's annuity the 4excess, if any, of the member's accumulated contributions plus 5credited interest over all annuity payments to the member and 6widow, exclusive of the $500 lump sum payment, shall be paid to 7the named beneficiary of the widow, or if none has been named, 8to the estate of the widow, provided no reversionary annuity 9is payable.10    (f) On January 1, 1981, any recipient of a widow's annuity 11who was receiving a widow's annuity on or before January 1, 121971, shall have her widow's annuity then being paid increased 13by 1% for each full year which has elapsed from the date the 14widow's annuity began. On January 1, 1982, any recipient of a 15widow's annuity who began receiving a widow's annuity after 16January 1, 1971, but before January 1, 1981, shall have her 17widow's annuity then being paid increased by 1% for each full 18year which has elapsed from the date the widow's annuity 19began. On January 1, 1987, any recipient of a widow's annuity 20who began receiving the widow's annuity on or before January 211, 1977, shall have the monthly widow's annuity increased by 22$1 for each full year which has elapsed since the date the 23annuity began.24    (g) Beginning January 1, 1990, every widow's annuity shall 25be increased (1) on each January 1 occurring on or after the 26commencement of the annuity if the deceased member died while   SB1070- 5 -LRB104 05408 RPS 15437 b1receiving a retirement annuity, or (2) in other cases, on each 2January 1 occurring on or after the first anniversary of the 3commencement of the annuity, by an amount equal to 3% of the 4current amount of the annuity, including any previous 5increases under this Article. Such increases shall apply 6without regard to whether the deceased member was in service 7on or after the effective date of Public Act 86-1488, but shall 8not accrue for any period prior to January 1, 1990.9(Source: P.A. 95-279, eff. 1-1-08; 95-1043, eff. 3-26-09.)